Florida, session 2026, SB24.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 50 51 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 52 found and declared to be true. 53 Section 2.âMiami-Dade County is authorized and directed to 54 appropriate from funds not otherwise encumbered and to draw a 55 warrant in the sum of $500,000 payable to Lourdes Latour and 56 Edward Latour as compensation for injuries and damages 57 sustained. 58 Section 3.âThe amount paid by Miami-Dade County pursuant to 59 s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded under this 60 act are intended to provide the sole compensation for all 61 present and future claims arising out of the factual situation 62 described in this act which resulted in injuries and damages to 63 Lourdes Latour and Edward Latour. The total amount paid for 64 attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent 65 of the total amount awarded under this act. 66 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.